Utah statutes.
4-5-17.   Authority to make and enforce rules.
(1)  The department may adopt rules to efficiently enforce this chapter, and
if practicable, adopt rules that conform to the regulations adopted under the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.
(2)  Hearings authorized or required by this chapter shall be conducted by the
department or by an officer, agent, or employee designated by the department.
(3) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (3)(b), all pesticide chemical
regulations and their amendments now or hereafter adopted under authority of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., are the
pesticide chemical regulations in this state.
(b)  The department may adopt a rule that prescribes tolerance for pesticides
in finished foods in this state whether or not in accordance with regulations
promulgated under the federal act.
(4) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (4)(b), all food additive
regulations and their amendments now or hereafter adopted under authority of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., are the
food additive regulations in this state.
(b)  The department may adopt a rule that prescribes conditions under which a
food additive may be used in this state whether or not in accordance with
regulations promulgated under the federal act.
(5)  All color additive regulations adopted under authority of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., are the color
additive rules in this state.
(6) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (6)(b), all special dietary use
regulations adopted under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., are the special dietary use rules in this
state.
(b)  The department may, if it finds it necessary to inform purchasers of the
value of a food for special dietary use, prescribe special dietary use rules
whether or not in accordance with regulations promulgated under the federal
act.
(7) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (7)(b), all regulations adopted
under the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1453 et seq., shall
be the rules in this state.
(b)  Except as provided by Subsection (7)(c), the department may, if it finds
it necessary in the interest of consumers, prescribe package and labeling
rules for consumer commodities, whether or not in accordance with regulations
promulgated under the federal act.
(c)  The department may not adopt rules that are contrary to the labeling
requirements for the net quantity of contents required according to 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1453(4).
(8) (a)  A federal regulation automatically adopted according to this chapter
takes effect in this state on the date it becomes effective as a federal
regulation.
(b)  The department shall publish all other proposed rules in publications
prescribed by the department.
(c) (i)  A person who may be adversely affected by a rule may, within 30 days
after a federal regulation is automatically adopted, or within 30 days after
publication of any other rule, file with the department, in writing,
objections and a request for a hearing.
(ii)  The timely filing of substantial objections to a federal regulation
automatically adopted stays the effect of the rule.
(d) (i)  If no substantial objections are received and no hearing is requested
within 30 days after publication of a proposed rule, it shall take effect on a
date set by the department.
(ii)  The effective date shall be at least 60 days after the time for filing
objections has expired.
(e) (i)  If timely substantial objections are made to a federal regulation
within 30 days after it is automatically adopted or to a proposed rule within
30 days after it is published, the department, after notice, shall conduct a
public hearing to receive evidence on the issues raised by the objections.
(ii)  Any interested person or his representative may be heard.
(f) (i)  The department shall act upon objections by order and shall mail the
order to objectors by certified mail as soon after the hearing as practicable.
(ii)  The order shall be based on substantial evidence in the record of the
hearing.
(g) (i)  If the order concerns a proposed rule, it may withdraw it or set an
effective date for the rule as published or as modified by the order.
(ii)  The effective date shall be at least 60 days after publication of the
order.
(9)  Whenever a regulation is promulgated under authority of the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., establishing standards for
food, the tolerances established by the department under this chapter shall
immediately conform to the standards established by the Federal Food and Drug
Administration as herein provided and shall remain the same until the
department determines that for reasons peculiar to Utah a different rule
should apply.
